src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-k43_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    faðir+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: faðir
    faðir+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: faðir
    faðir+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: faðir
    faðir+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: faðirs
    faðir+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: fedrar
    faðir+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: fedrar
    faðir+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: fedrum
    faðir+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: fedra
    faðir+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: faðirin
    faðir+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: faðirin
    faðir+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: [faðirinum, faðirnum]
    faðir+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: faðirsins
    faðir+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: fedrarnir
    faðir+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: fedrarnar
    faðir+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: fedrunum
    faðir+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: fedranna
